Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.092

Licensed dealer deliveries—Background checks.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a licensed dealer may not deliver any firearm to a purchaser or transferee until:

(1) The results of all required background checks are known and the purchaser or transferee (a) is not prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm under federal or state law and (b) does not have a voluntary waiver of firearm rights currently in effect; and

(2) Ten business days have elapsed from the date the licensed dealer requested the background check.

[ 2023 c 161 s 4; 2019 c 3 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1639, approved November 6, 2018); 2018 c 145 s 4; 2015 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 594, approved November 4, 2014).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 161: See note following RCW 9.41.090.

Finding—Short title—Effective dates—Implementation—2019 c 3 (Initiative Measure No. 1639): See notes following RCW 9.41.360.

Effective date—2018 c 145 ss 1, 3, and 4: See note following RCW 9.41.350.

Finding—2015 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 594): See note following RCW 9.41.010.